New Jersey, session 221, A2907.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.39:3-74 to the contrary, a global positioning system navigation device may be mounted or located in a position on a motor vehicles dashboard, console, or windshield, provided that the device is mounted or located in a position that does not unduly restrict or interfere with the vision of the motor vehicles operator. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.